Hawaii statutes.
§47-46 Disputed ownership. If there
are two or more claimants claiming adversely, each to the other or others, to
be the owner in due course of a bond, coupon, or both, as the case may be,
alleged to have been lost, stolen, destroyed, or defaced, the director of
finance, in the director's discretion, may require the claimants, if not within
the State, to appoint agents within the State to accept service of process, or
otherwise to submit to the jurisdiction of the courts of the State, and may
bring suit on behalf of the State in any circuit court against the claimants,
by interpleader, for the determination of the claimant or claimants entitled to
the payment of the bond, coupon, or both, as the case may be. Jurisdiction is
hereby conferred upon the designated circuit court to hear and determine,
without a jury, the suits and to determine whether any of the claimants is
entitled to the payment, and, if so, which of the claimants is so entitled;
provided that no such judicial determination shall dispense with the condition
prescribed by section 47-45 requiring a surety bond before the payment of the
claims. The cost of the suit shall be borne by the claimants and the court may
decree the payment of such costs by any of the unsuccessful claimants, or the apportionments
thereof, as may be deemed just. The decision of the court may be appealed to
the intermediate appellate court, subject to chapter 602, in the manner
provided for civil appeals from the circuit court. [L 1989, c 80, pt of §2; am
L 2004, c 202, §6; am L 2006, c 94, §1; am L 2010, c 109, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next